Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1038.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 137, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 25, O.S.L. 2024 (59 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 137), is amended to read as follows:


Section 137. A. A Board of Podiatric Medical Examiners is


hereby re-created, to continue until July 1, 2027, in accordance


with the provisions of the Oklahoma Sunset Law. The Board shall


regulate the practice of podiatric medicine in this state in


accordance with the provisions of the Podiatric Medicine Practice


Act. The Board, appointed by the Governor, shall be composed of


five podiatric physicians licensed to practice podiatric medicine in


this state and one lay member representing the public.

Req. No. 1518 Page 1


B. Each podiatric physician member of the Board shall:


1. Be a legal resident of this state;


2. Have practiced podiatric medicine continuously in this state


during the three (3) years immediately preceding appointment to the


Board;


3. Be free of pending disciplinary action or active


investigation by the Board; and


4. Be a member in good standing of the American Podiatric


Medical Association and of the Oklahoma Podiatric Medical


Association.


C. The lay member of the Board shall:


1. Be a legal resident of this state;


2. Not be a registered or licensed practitioner of any of the


healing arts or be related, within the third degree of consanguinity


or affinity, to any such person; and


3. Participate in Board proceedings only for the purposes of:


a. reviewing, investigating and disposing of written


complaints regarding the conduct of podiatric


physicians, and


b. formulating, adopting and promulgating rules pursuant


to Article I of the Administrative Procedures Act.


D. Except as provided in subsection E of this section, the term


of office of each podiatric physician member of the Board shall be


five (5) years, with one such member being appointed to the Board

Req. No. 1518 Page 2


each year. The lay member of the Board shall serve a term


coterminous with that of the Governor. Each member shall hold


office until the expiration of the term for which he or she was


appointed or until a qualified successor has been duly appointed.


An appointment shall be made by the Governor within ninety (90) days


after the expiration of the term of any member, or the occurrence of


a vacancy on the Board due to resignation, death, or any other cause


resulting in an unexpired term. The appointment of the podiatric


physician members shall be made from a list of not less than five


persons submitted annually to the Governor by the Oklahoma Podiatric


Medical Association In selecting appointees, the Governor may


consider recommendations from a statewide organization representing


podiatric physicians, a state chapter of a national organization


representing podiatric physicians, or other groups or individuals in


this state.


E. Each of the three podiatric physician members of the Board,


serving on September 1, 1993, shall complete the term of office for


which he or she was appointed, and the successor to each such member


shall be appointed for a term of five (5) years. Within sixty (60)


days after September 1, 1993, the Governor shall appoint two new


podiatric physician members to the Board, one for a term expiring


July 1, 1997, and one for a term expiring on July 1, 1998. The


successor to each such new member shall be appointed for a term of


five (5) years.

Req. No. 1518 Page 3


F. Before assuming duties on the Board, each member shall take


and subscribe to the oath or affirmation provided in Article XV of


the Oklahoma Constitution, which oath or affirmation shall be


administered and filed as provided in such article.


G. A member may be removed from the Board by the Governor for


cause which shall include, but not be limited to:


1. Ceasing to be qualified;


2. Being found guilty by a court of competent jurisdiction of a


felony or of any offense involving moral turpitude;


3. Being found guilty, through due process, of malfeasance,


misfeasance or nonfeasance in relation to Board duties;


4. Being found mentally incompetent by a court of competent


jurisdiction;


5. Being found in violation of any provision of the Podiatric


Medicine Practice Act; or


6. Failing to attend three consecutive meetings of the Board


without just cause, as determined by the Board.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1518 DC 1/16/2025 2:35:56 PM









Req. No. 1518 Page 4